Illinois, session 104th, SB275.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 5-410 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/5-410)7    Sec. 5-410. Non-secure custody or detention. 8    (1) Any minor arrested or taken into custody pursuant to 9this Act who requires care away from the minor's home but who 10does not require physical restriction shall be given temporary 11care in a foster family home or other shelter facility 12designated by the court.13    (2)(a) Any minor 10 years of age or older arrested 14pursuant to this Act where there is probable cause to believe 15that the minor is a delinquent minor and that (i) secure 16custody is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the 17protection of the minor or of the person or property of 18another, (ii) the minor is likely to flee the jurisdiction of 19the court, or (iii) the minor was taken into custody under a 20warrant, may be kept or detained in an authorized detention 21facility. A minor under 13 years of age shall not be admitted, 22kept, or detained in a detention facility unless a local youth 23service provider, including a provider through the   SB0275- 2 -LRB104 03915 RLC 13939 b1Comprehensive Community Based Youth Services network, has been 2contacted and has not been able to accept the minor. No minor 3under 12 years of age shall be detained in a county jail or a 4municipal lockup for more than 6 hours.5    (a-5) For a minor arrested or taken into custody for 6vehicular hijacking or aggravated vehicular hijacking, a 7previous finding of delinquency for vehicular hijacking or 8aggravated vehicular hijacking shall be given greater weight 9in determining whether secured custody of a minor is a matter 10of immediate and urgent necessity for the protection of the 11minor or of the person or property of another. 12    (b) The written authorization of the probation officer or 13detention officer (or other public officer designated by the 14court in a county having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) 15constitutes authority for the superintendent of any juvenile 16detention home to detain and keep a minor for up to 40 hours, 17excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court-designated holidays. 18These records shall be available to the same persons and 19pursuant to the same conditions as are law enforcement records 20as provided in Section 5-905.21    (b-4) The consultation required by paragraph (b-5) shall 22not be applicable if the probation officer or detention 23officer (or other public officer designated by the court in a 24county having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) utilizes a 25scorable detention screening instrument, which has been 26developed with input by the State's Attorney, to determine   SB0275- 3 -LRB104 03915 RLC 13939 b1whether a minor should be detained; however, paragraph (b-5) 2shall still be applicable where no such screening instrument 3is used or where the probation officer, detention officer (or 4other public officer designated by the court in a county 5having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) deviates from the 6screening instrument.7    (b-5) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (b-4), if a 8probation officer or detention officer (or other public 9officer designated by the court in a county having 3,000,000 10or more inhabitants) does not intend to detain a minor for an 11offense which constitutes one of the following offenses, the 12probation officer or detention officer (or other public 13officer designated by the court in a county having 3,000,000 14or more inhabitants) shall consult with the State's Attorney's 15Office prior to the release of the minor: first degree murder, 16second degree murder, involuntary manslaughter, criminal 17sexual assault, aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated 18battery with a firearm as described in Section 12-4.2 or 19subdivision (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), or (e)(4) of Section 2012-3.05, aggravated or heinous battery involving permanent 21disability or disfigurement or great bodily harm, robbery, 22aggravated robbery, armed robbery, vehicular hijacking, 23aggravated vehicular hijacking, vehicular invasion, arson, 24aggravated arson, kidnapping, aggravated kidnapping, home 25invasion, burglary, or residential burglary. Any minor 15 26years of age or older arrested or taken into custody under this   SB0275- 4 -LRB104 03915 RLC 13939 b1Act for aggravated vehicular hijacking shall be detained in an 2authorized detention facility until a detention or shelter 3care hearing is held to determine if there is probable cause to 4believe that the minor is a delinquent minor and: (1) secure 5custody is a matter of immediate and urgent necessity for the 6protection of the minor or of the person or property of 7another; (2) the minor is likely to flee the jurisdiction of 8the court; or (3) the minor was taken into custody under a 9warrant. If the court makes that determination, the minor 10shall continue to be held until the disposition of an 11adjudicatory hearing under this Article. 12    (c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a), (d), or 13(e), no minor shall be detained in a county jail or municipal 14lockup for more than 12 hours, unless the offense is a crime of 15violence in which case the minor may be detained up to 24 16hours. For the purpose of this paragraph, "crime of violence" 17has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1-10 of the Substance 18Use Disorder Act.19        (i) The period of detention is deemed to have begun 20    once the minor has been placed in a locked room or cell or 21    handcuffed to a stationary object in a building housing a 22    county jail or municipal lockup. Time spent transporting a 23    minor is not considered to be time in detention or secure 24    custody.25        (ii) Any minor so confined shall be under periodic 26    supervision and shall not be permitted to come into or   SB0275- 5 -LRB104 03915 RLC 13939 b1    remain in contact with adults in custody in the building.2        (iii) Upon placement in secure custody in a jail or 3    lockup, the minor shall be informed of the purpose of the 4    detention, the time it is expected to last and the fact 5    that it cannot exceed the time specified under this Act.6        (iv) A log shall be kept which shows the offense which 7    is the basis for the detention, the reasons and 8    circumstances for the decision to detain, and the length 9    of time the minor was in detention.10        (v) Violation of the time limit on detention in a 11    county jail or municipal lockup shall not, in and of 12    itself, render inadmissible evidence obtained as a result 13    of the violation of this time limit. Minors under 18 years 14    of age shall be kept separate from confined adults and may 15    not at any time be kept in the same cell, room, or yard 16    with adults confined pursuant to criminal law. Persons 18 17    years of age and older who have a petition of delinquency 18    filed against them may be confined in an adult detention 19    facility. In making a determination whether to confine a 20    person 18 years of age or older who has a petition of 21    delinquency filed against the person, these factors, among 22    other matters, shall be considered:23            (A) the age of the person;24            (B) any previous delinquent or criminal history of 25        the person;26            (C) any previous abuse or neglect history of the   SB0275- 6 -LRB104 03915 RLC 13939 b1        person; and2            (D) any mental health or educational history of 3        the person, or both.4    (d)(i) If a minor 12 years of age or older is confined in a 5county jail in a county with a population below 3,000,000 6inhabitants, then the minor's confinement shall be implemented 7in such a manner that there will be no contact by sight, sound, 8or otherwise between the minor and adult prisoners. Minors 12 9years of age or older must be kept separate from confined 10adults and may not at any time be kept in the same cell, room, 11or yard with confined adults. This paragraph (d)(i) shall only 12apply to confinement pending an adjudicatory hearing and shall 13not exceed 40 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and 14court-designated holidays. To accept or hold minors during 15this time period, county jails shall comply with all 16monitoring standards adopted by the Department of Corrections 17and training standards approved by the Illinois Law 18Enforcement Training Standards Board.19    (ii) To accept or hold minors, 12 years of age or older, 20after the time period prescribed in paragraph (d)(i) of this 21subsection (2) of this Section but not exceeding 7 days 22including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays pending an 23adjudicatory hearing, county jails shall comply with all 24temporary detention standards adopted by the Department of 25Corrections and training standards approved by the Illinois 26Law Enforcement Training Standards Board.  SB0275- 7 -LRB104 03915 RLC 13939 b1    (iii) To accept or hold minors 12 years of age or older, 2after the time period prescribed in paragraphs (d)(i) and 3(d)(ii) of this subsection (2) of this Section, county jails 4shall comply with all county juvenile detention standards 5adopted by the Department of Juvenile Justice.6    (e) When a minor who is at least 15 years of age is 7prosecuted under the criminal laws of this State, the court 8may enter an order directing that the juvenile be confined in 9the county jail. However, any juvenile confined in the county 10jail under this provision shall be separated from adults who 11are confined in the county jail in such a manner that there 12will be no contact by sight, sound, or otherwise between the 13juvenile and adult prisoners.14    (f) For purposes of appearing in a physical lineup, the 15minor may be taken to a county jail or municipal lockup under 16the direct and constant supervision of a juvenile police 17officer. During such time as is necessary to conduct a lineup, 18and while supervised by a juvenile police officer, the sight 19and sound separation provisions shall not apply.20    (g) For purposes of processing a minor, the minor may be 21taken to a county jail or municipal lockup under the direct and 22constant supervision of a law enforcement officer or 23correctional officer. During such time as is necessary to 24process the minor, and while supervised by a law enforcement 25officer or correctional officer, the sight and sound 26separation provisions shall not apply.  SB0275- 8 -LRB104 03915 RLC 13939 b1    (3) If the probation officer or State's Attorney (or such 2other public officer designated by the court in a county 3having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants) determines that the 4minor may be a delinquent minor as described in subsection (3) 5of Section 5-105, and should be retained in custody but does 6not require physical restriction, the minor may be placed in 7non-secure custody for up to 40 hours pending a detention 8hearing.9    (4) Any minor taken into temporary custody, not requiring 10secure detention, may, however, be detained in the home of the 11minor's parent or guardian subject to such conditions as the 12court may impose.13    (5) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 98-61 14apply to a minor who has been arrested or taken into custody on 15or after January 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 1698-61). 17(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)